apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="кня/зь__n_m_an">
      <e><p><l>зь</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зя</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зя</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зю</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зем</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>же</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зья</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зи</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зей</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зей</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зьям</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зьями</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зьях</l><r>зь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ью</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ей</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="господ/ин__n_m_an">
      <e><p><l>ин</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ина</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ина</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ину</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ином</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ине</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="орден__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="кол/ьцо__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>ьцо</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьцо</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьца</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьцу</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьцом</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьце</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьца</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьца</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ец</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьцам</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьцами</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьцах</l><r>ьцо<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="ок/но__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>но</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>но</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>на</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ну</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ном</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>не</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>на</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>на</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>он</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нам</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нами</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нах</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  

    <e lm="вещь"><i>вещ</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="волокно"><i>волок</i><par n="ок/но__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="горечь"><i>гореч</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="господин"><i>господ</i><par n="господ/ин__n_m_an"/></e>
    <e lm="князь"><i>кня</i><par n="кня/зь__n_m_an"/></e>
    <e lm="кольцо"><i>кол</i><par n="кол/ьцо__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="крыльцо"><i>крыл</i><par n="кол/ьцо__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="мелочь"><i>мелоч</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="молодёжь"><i>молодёж</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="мощь"><i>мощ</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="окно"><i>ок</i><par n="ок/но__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="орден"><i>орден</i><par n="орден__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="печь"><i>печ</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="помощь"><i>помощ</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="речь"><i>реч</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="роскошь"><i>роскош</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сукно"><i>сук</i><par n="ок/но__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="течь"><i>теч</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="речь идёт"><i>речь</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/><p><l><b/>идёт</l><r><g><b/>идёт</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="взаимопомощь"><i>взаимопомощ</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="пектораль"><i>пекторал</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="флешь"><i>флеш</i><par n="вещ/ь__n_f_nn"/></e>
